Mississippi, session 2026, SB2801.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-33-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-33-1.  (1)  For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this subsection, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Hand-held mobile telephone" means a mobile telephone or other portable electronic communication device with which a user engages in a call or writes, sends or reads a text message using at least one (1) hand.  The term "hand-held mobile telephone" shall not include a voice-operated or hands-free device * * *;. (b)  "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle driven or drawn by mechanical power and manufactured primarily for use on public highways * * *;. (c)  "Social networking site" means any web-based service that allows individuals to construct a profile within a founded system, articulate a list of other users with whom they share a connection, and communicate with other users of the site * * *;. (d)  "Text message" includes a text-based message, instant message, electronic message, and email, but shall not include an emergency, traffic or weather alert or a message related to the operation or navigation of the motor vehicle * * *;. (e)  "Voice-operated or hands-free device" means a device that allows the user to write, send, or read a text message without the use of either hand except to activate, deactivate, or initiate a feature or function; and. (f) "Writing," "sending" and "reading," with respect to a text message, means the manual entry, sending, or retrieval of a text message, respectively, to communicate with any person or device. (2)  An operator of a moving motor vehicle is prohibited from writing, sending, or reading a text message and from accessing, reading or posting to a social networking site using a hand-held mobile telephone while driving a motor vehicle. (3)  (a)  (i)  A violation of this section that occurs in a school zone or work zone is a civil violation, and upon being found in violation, is punishable by a civil penalty of * * * Twenty‑five Dollars ($25.00) for violations committed until July 1, 2016, and One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for violations committed from and after July 1, 2016 Two Hundred and Fifty Dollars ($250.00). (ii)  If a person is involved in a crash at the time of the violation, then the fine shall be equal to double the amount of the fine imposed in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and the law enforcement officer investigating the crash shall indicate on the written accident report that the person was using a hand-held mobile telephone at the time of the crash. (b)  (i)  A violation of this section that occurs in a location other than a school zone or highway construction zone is a civil violation, and upon being found in violation, is punishable by a civil penalty of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (ii)  If a person is involved in a crash at the time of the violation, then the fine shall be equal to double the amount of the fine imposed in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and the law enforcement officer investigating the crash shall indicate on the written accident report that the person was using a hand-held mobile telephone at the time of the crash. (c)  No state assessments shall be imposed or collected for a violation under this section. (4)  The Department of Public Safety shall keep and maintain records of citations issued under this section, including the age and race of the vehicle operator, whether there was an additional traffic violation by the vehicle operator, and whether there was a crash or any damage to a vehicle or passenger at the time of the citation. (5)  No law enforcement officer may conduct a traffic stop based solely on a violation of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.